src-fst-morphology-stems-adjectives.lexc.md
# Na hAidiactaí Tuairisciúla - Descriptive Adjectives
(c)2001
(1) New Irish Grammar by The Christian Brothers  
(2) Réchúrsa Gramadaí, Brian Mac Giolla Phádraig
(3) Graméir Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí
(4) Nuachúrsa Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí
(5) A Handbook of Irish Vol 2.An Outline of Modern Irish Grammar,
Alfred Bammesberger
(6) Ó Dónaill Irish-English Dictionary
(7) Gléacht - Ó Dónaill Online Dictionary 
Descriptive adjectives can be used in two ways (REF P59 NIG)
a) predicatively - quailifies a noun/pronoun *indirectly* as a predicate 
or part of a predicate
E.G. Is BREÁ an lá é (It is a LOVELY day, lit. it is lovely that the day is (approx!)
E.G. Tá mé TUIRSEACH (I am TIRED)
E.G. Tá sé FUAR (It is COLD)
E.G. Tá an fhuinneog GLAN (The window is CLEAN) !    Used in this way the base form IS NOT INFLECTED to agree with case/number/gender
of the noun - except in a few cases ... see p 59 s4 NIG
The base form (positive degree) is used
b) attributively - qualifies a noun *directly*
E.G. Tá an páiste ÓG ar scoil (The YOUNG child is a at school
E.G. Níl pingin RUA agam (I haven't a RED penny)
E.G. Chonaic mé an fhuinneog GHLAN (I saw the CLEAN window)
Used in this form the adjective IS INFLECTED to agree with case/number/gender of the noun
The adjective usually follows the noun though some forms can be prefixed
to the noun e.g. SEANfhear (old man) LAGmhisneach ((in) low spirits),
ARDeagalis (cathedral - lit. high church) 
					L E X I C O N
**LEXICON AdjA**

SEE PREP/NUM etc dá	Adj3-1;	 ! do or de +

I R R E G U L A R   A D J E C T I V E S 

the following always come at the end of the noun/pron/adj and cannot 
be intermingled with other adjectives 
Have moved to Demonstrative Determiners 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc)</small>
